Utah statutes.
31A-19a-212.   Premium increases prohibited for certain claims or inquiries.
(1)  Each rate, rating schedule, and rating manual filed for personal lines
insurance may not permit a premium increase due to:
(a)  a telephone call or other inquiry that does not result in the insured
requesting the payment of a claim; or
(b)  a claim under a policy of insurance covering a motor vehicle or the
operation of a motor vehicle resulting from any incident, including acts of
vandalism, in which the person named in the policy or any other person using
the insured motor vehicle with the express or implied permission of the named
insured is not at fault.
(2)  Subsection (1) prohibits a premium increase when:
(a)  a policy is issued; or
(b)  a policy is renewed.
(3)  This section is an exception to Section 31A-19a-201.
